Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.3411

Revenue bonds or warrants.

For the purposes provided for in this chapter, an operating agency shall have power to issue revenue bonds or warrants payable from the revenues of the utility properties operated by it. Whenever the board of a joint operating agency shall deem it advisable to issue bonds or warrants to engage in conservation activities or to construct or acquire any public utility or any works, plants or facilities or any additions or betterments thereto or extensions thereof it shall provide therefor by resolution, which shall specify and adopt the system or plan proposed and declare the estimated cost thereof as near as may be. Such cost may include funds for working capital, for payment of expenses incurred in the conservation activities or the acquisition or construction of the utility and for the repayment of advances made to the operating agency by any public utility district or city. Except as otherwise provided in RCW 43.52.343, all the provisions of law as now or hereafter in effect relating to revenue bonds or warrants of public utility districts shall apply to revenue bonds or warrants issued by the joint operating agency including, without limitation, provisions relating to: The creation of special funds and the pledging of revenues thereto; the time and place of payment of such bonds or warrants and the interest rate or rates thereon; the covenants that may be contained therein and the effect thereof; the execution, issuance, sale, funding, or refunding, redemption and registration of such bonds or warrants; and the status thereof as negotiable instruments, as legal securities for deposits of public moneys and as legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries and for savings and loan associations, banks and insurance companies doing business in this state. However, for revenue bonds or warrants issued by an operating agency, the provisions under RCW 54.24.030 relating to additional or alternate methods for payment may be made a part of the contract with the owners of any revenue bonds or warrants of an operating agency. The board may authorize the managing director or the treasurer of the operating agency to sell revenue bonds or warrants maturing one year or less from the date of issuance, and to fix the interest rate or rates on such revenue bonds or warrants with such restrictions as the board shall prescribe. Such bonds and warrants may be in any form, including bearer bonds or bearer warrants, or registered bonds or registered warrants as provided in RCW 39.46.030. Such bonds and warrants may also be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1987 c 376 s 10; 1983 c 167 s 116; 1981 1st ex.s. c 1 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.52.3411. Prior: 1957 c 295 s 6.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Severability—1981 1st ex.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.52.250.